Utah statutes.
10-9a-212.   Notice for an amendment to public improvements in a subdivision or development.

Prior to implementing an amendment to adopted specifications for public improvements that apply to subdivision or development, a municipality shall give 30 days mailed notice and an opportunity to comment to anyone who has requested the notice in writing.



Enacted by Chapter 216, 2012 General Session

